Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5526.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Legislative Findings and Purpose.
(1) The Thundermist Family Medicine Residency Program is a critical component in
addressing the healthcare needs of Rhode Island residents, particularly in underserved and rural
areas; and
(2) Family medicine residency programs play a vital role in training the next generation of
primary care physicians, who are essential for improving health outcomes and reducing healthcare
disparities; and
(3) The demand for primary care services continues to grow in Rhode Island, necessitating
increased investment in family medicine training programs to ensure an adequate workforce; and
(4) Other healthcare institutions in Rhode Island, such as Landmark Medical Center,
receive state funding to support their missions, underscoring the importance of equitable state
investment in healthcare initiatives; and
(5) Funding for the Thundermist Family Medicine Residency Program will enhance the
program's capacity to recruit and retain highly qualified medical residents, expand training
opportunities, and improve access to care for Rhode Island residents.
SECTION 2. Title 40 of the General Laws entitled "HUMAN SERVICES" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 8.16

THUNDERMIST FAMILY MEDICINE RESIDENCY PROGRAM
40-8.16-1. Appropriation of funds.
(a) For the fiscal year 2026 and every fiscal year thereafter, the State of Rhode Island shall
appropriate the sum of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) to the Thundermist family
medicine residency program for the purpose of supporting its operational and educational activities,
including, but not limited to:
(1) Recruitment and retention of residents and faculty;
(2) Development and implementation of innovative curriculum focused on primary care
and community health;
(3) Expansion of clinical training sites in underserved and rural areas;
(4) Acquisition of necessary equipment and resources to enhance training and patient care;
(5) Support for administrative functions and program evaluation.
(b) The funds appropriated under this section shall be administered by the department of
health in collaboration with the Thundermist health center.
40-8.16-2. Reporting requirements.
(a) The Thundermist family medicine residency program shall submit an annual report to
the general assembly and the department of health, detailing the use of state funds, program
outcomes, and its impact on addressing the primary care needs of Rhode Island residents.
(b) The report shall include:
(1) Number of residents trained and their subsequent practice locations (as applicable);
(2) Summary of program activities and curriculum enhancements;
(3) Financial statement detailing the use of state funds; and
(4) Evaluation of the program’s impact on healthcare access and outcomes in Rhode Island.
40-8.16-3. Severability.
If any provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter, which
can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end, the provisions of
this chapter are declared to be severable.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
========
LC001530
========
LC001530 - Page 2 of 3